Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 11

Employee Suggestion System

Effective Dates. Acts 1981, No. 856, § 14: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Third General Assembly that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to prevent irreparable harm to the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 31, § 4: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1991, No. 1219, § 5: Apr. 10, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the 78th General Assembly that the Employee Suggestion System rules and regulations be revised in order to more effectively administer this program. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

21-11-101. Definition — Exceptions.

As used in this chapter, “employee” shall mean all full-time state employees of all departments, agencies, boards, commissions, or other agencies of the state supported by appropriation of state or federal funds except the following excluded employees:

The elected constitutional officers of this state, including employees of the office of the Governor;

The General Assembly and its employees, including employees of the Bureau of Legislative Research and Arkansas Legislative Audit;

Members of the Supreme Court, circuit courts, and prosecuting attorneys;

Members of the Governor's cabinet, agency directors, or other persons appointed by the Governor as head of a board or commission;

Employees occupying a teaching or athletic coaching position at a state-supported institution of higher education; and

Those other employees designated as excluded from the provisions of this chapter by the rules established by the State Personnel Administrator.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (6).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 856, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-4001; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2333.

21-11-102. Penalty.

Any cabinet member or head of a department, agency, board, commission, or other agency of state government who fails to comply with or implement a money-saving suggestions program as outlined in this chapter shall be deemed to be derelict in his or her duties and subject to dismissal.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 856, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-4012.

21-11-103. Employee Suggestion System established.

There is established a program to be known as the “Employee Suggestion System” to encourage the development of ideas for improving the economy and efficiency of state government, to grant awards for ideas of proper merit, and to implement them in the governmental process.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 856, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-4002.

21-11-104. Rules — Procedure for submission of suggestions.

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, or his or her designee, is directed to develop and adopt rules in accordance with this chapter for the administration of the Employee Suggestion System.

The rules shall provide for the direct submission of all suggestions to the Office of Personnel Management's Employee Suggestion System for determination of eligibility under the rules as authorized in this section.

Eligible suggestions will be forwarded to the secretary, or to the secretary's designated representative, for evaluation of proper merit.

The names of individuals who make suggestions shall be kept confidential unless such person is granted an award under this chapter.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading; and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a) and following the second occurrence of “rules” in (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a).

The board will review suggestions after the suggestor has filed a formal appeal.

If, in the opinion of the board, further evaluation is needed, the board may request the agency to reevaluate the suggestion.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Subdivision (a)(2) was amended by Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 3498 and 6152. The amendments cannot be reconciled. Under the authority of §25-43-109, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission determined that § 6152 was the intended amendment and the correct section to codify and not § 3498.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 910, § 3498, substituted “Secretary of the Department ofDepartment of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” and “State Personnel Administrator” for “Personnel Director” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, §6152, substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” and “State Personnel Administrator” for “Personnel Director” in (a)(2).

However, the monetary award shall be limited to a maximum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) unless a larger award is recommended by resolution of the General Assembly.

If an employee's suggestion appears to be one which may improve the economy and efficiency of state government but would require legislative enactment, the suggestor shall receive a monetary award as prescribed in subsection (a) of this section based on the actual net savings after the end of the first year following implementation of the suggestion.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Office of Personnel Management” in (a).

ALR.

Refusal to submit to polygraph examination as ground for discharge or suspension of public employees or officers. 15 A.L.R.4th 1207.

Am. Jur. 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Pub. Off., § 153 et seq.

C.J.S. 67 C.J.S., Officers, § 227 et seq.

Cross References. Governor and all state officers, judges of the Supreme and circuit courts, chancellors, and prosecuting attorneys liable to impeachment, Ark. Const., Art. 15, § 1.

House of Representatives has sole power of impeachment, Ark. Const., Art. 15, § 2.

When implementation of a suggestion would not result in cost reduction or avoidance but would visibly improve the operations of a process or program or improve public relations, safety, or effectiveness of operations as indicated in § 21-11-103, recognition of the suggestor will be made by the issuance of a suitable certificate and a monetary award of one hundred dollars ($100).

When it is determined by the Personnel Director that a monetary award is to be made under the rules of the Employee Suggestion System, he or she shall certify the amount to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall cause a transfer to be made of the amount of moneys awarded from the fund from which the benefiting employee is being paid to the State Central Services Fund.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the Treasurer of State shall issue warrants to employees for approved suggestions in accordance with this chapter.

No agency, board, or commission shall receive additional appropriations or funds to carry out this chapter except the Office of Personnel Management, which shall be allocated funds and appropriations to administer it.

All monetary awards prescribed in § 21-11-107(a) shall be made from the amount of appropriated money saved by the suggestions of employees.

The minimum monetary award prescribed in § 21-11-107(b) shall be made from the agency's existing appropriation for the general maintenance and operation of the agency.

For a period of one (1) year after leaving state employment, a person whose principal function in state employment is to apply for or assist in the preparation of applications for state or federal grants shall not assist, for compensation, another person applying for a grant of state or federal funds.

Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a violation and subject to a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted “guilty of a violation and” in (b).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 856, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-4003; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2334; 2019, No. 910, § 6151.

21-11-105. Suggestion Award Board.

(1)There is created the Suggestion Award Board.

The membership of the board shall consist of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, the State Personnel Administrator, who shall serve as chair, and the cochairs of the Legislative Council.

The decisions of the board regarding suggestions, awards, and appeals shall be final and binding to all parties concerned.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 856, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-4004; Acts 1991, No. 1219, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§
3498, 6152.

21-11-106. Reports by Personnel Director.

The Personnel Director shall prepare and annually transmit a report detailing the operations of the Employee Suggestion System, including an accounting of all awards granted and any other information deemed appropriate by the director and the Governor.

(1)The director shall submit monthly to the Suggestion Award Board a list of all suggestions which have been at agencies for evaluation for a period exceeding thirty (30) days.

The list shall show the suggestion number, the agency doing the evaluation, and the date the suggestion was sent to the agency for evaluation.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 856, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-4005.

21-11-107. Awards for suggestions.

(1)(A)Any monetary award granted for a suggestion which may improve the economy and efficiency of state government shall be the greater of one hundred dollars ($100) or ten percent (10%) of the amount of savings.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 856, §§ 7, 8, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-4006, 12-4007, 12-4011; Acts 1991, No. 1219, § 2.

21-11-108. Payment of awards.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 856, § 9; 1983, No. 31, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-4008, 12-4010.

21-11-109. Funding.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 856, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-4009; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6153.